Nebraska, session 109, LB915.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB915 LB915
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 13-3304, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
13-3304 (1) Any city which encompasses an area greater than three
hundred acres eligible to be designated as an inland port district may
propose to create an inland port authority by ordinance, subject to the
cap on the total number of inland port districts provided in subsection
(4) of this section. In determining whether to propose the creation of an
inland port authority, the city shall consider the following criteria:
(a) The desirability and economic feasibility of locating an inland
port district within the corporate boundaries, extraterritorial zoning
jurisdiction, or both of the city;
(b) The technical and economic capability of the city and any other
public and private entities to plan and carry out development within the
proposed inland port district;
(c) The strategic location of the proposed inland port district in
proximity to existing and potential transportation infrastructure that is
conducive to facilitating regional, national, and international trade and
the businesses and facilities that promote and complement such trade;
(d) The potential impact that development of the proposed inland
port district will have on the immediate area; and
(e) The regional and statewide economic impact of development of the
proposed inland port district.
(2) Any city and one or more counties in which a city of the
metropolitan class, city of the primary class, or city of the first class
is located, or in which the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of such
city is located, which encompass an area greater than three hundred acres
eligible to be designated as an inland port district may enter into an
agreement pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act to propose joint
creation of an inland port authority, subject to the cap on the total
number of inland port districts provided in subsection (4) of this
section. In determining whether to propose the creation of an inland port
-2-

LB915 LB915
2026 2026
authority, the city and counties shall consider the following criteria:
(a) The desirability and economic feasibility of locating an inland
port district within the corporate boundaries or extraterritorial zoning
jurisdiction or both of the city, or within both the corporate boundaries
or extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction or both of a city and the
boundaries of one or more counties;
(b) The technical and economic capability of the city and county or
counties and any other public and private entities to plan and carry out
development within the proposed inland port district;
(c) The strategic location of the proposed inland port district in
proximity to existing and potential transportation infrastructure that is
conducive to facilitating regional, national, and international trade and
the businesses and facilities that promote and complement such trade;
(d) The potential impact that development of the proposed inland
port district will have on the immediate area; and
(e) The regional and statewide economic impact of development of the
proposed inland port district.
(3) Any county with a population greater than twenty thousand
inhabitants according to the most recent federal census or the most
recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census
which encompasses an area greater than three hundred acres eligible to be
designated as an inland port district may propose to create an inland
port authority by resolution, subject to the cap on the total number of
inland port districts provided in subsection (4) of this section. In
determining whether to propose the creation of an inland port authority,
the county shall consider the following criteria:
(a) The desirability and economic feasibility of locating an inland
port district within the county;
(b) The technical and economic capability of the county and any
other public or private entities to plan and carry out development within
the proposed inland port district;
-3-

LB915 LB915
2026 2026
(c) The strategic location of the proposed inland port district in
proximity to existing and potential transportation infrastructure that is
conducive to facilitating regional, national, and international trade and
the businesses and facilities that promote and complement such trade;
(d) The potential impact that development of the proposed inland
port district will have on the immediate area; and
(e) The regional and statewide economic impact of development of the
proposed inland port district.
(4) No more than six five inland port districts may be designated
statewide. No more than one inland port district may be designated within
the boundaries of a city of the metropolitan class. No inland port
authority shall designate more than one inland port district, and no
inland port authority may be created without also designating an inland
port district.
(5) Following the adoption of an ordinance, resolution, or execution
of an agreement pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act proposing
creation of an inland port authority, the city clerk or county clerk
shall transmit a copy of such ordinance, resolution, or agreement to the
Department of Economic Development along with an application for approval
of the proposal. Upon receipt of such ordinance, resolution, or agreement
and application, the department shall evaluate the proposed inland port
authority to determine whether the proposal meets the criteria in
subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section, whichever is applicable, as
well as any prioritization criteria developed by the department. Upon a
determination that the proposed inland port authority sufficiently meets
such criteria, the Director of Economic Development shall certify to the
city clerk or county clerk whether the proposed creation of such inland
port authority exceeds the cap on the total number of inland port
districts pursuant to subsection (4) of this section. If the department
determines that the proposed inland port authority sufficiently meets
such criteria and does not exceed such cap, the inland port authority
-4-

LB915 LB915
2026 2026
shall be deemed created. If the proposed inland port authority does not
sufficiently meet such criteria or exceeds such cap, the city shall
repeal such ordinance, the county shall repeal such resolution, or the
city and county or counties shall rescind such agreement and the proposed
inland port authority shall not be created.
Sec. 2. Original section 13-3304, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-5-